Florida, session 2026, SB780.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 30 31 Section 1.â(1)âThe Office of Program Policy Analysis and 32 Government Accountability, the Auditor General, and the 33 Government Efficiency Task Force shall work together to prepare 34 a report identifying fraud, waste, abuse of authority, 35 malfeasance, mismanagement, and misconduct in state government. 36 The report must include an investigation and evaluation of all 37 state spending, including, but not limited to: 38 (a)âSpending related to Executive Order 23-03, including 39 contracts related to the South Florida Detention Facility, also 40 known as âAlligator Alcatrazâ; funds related to deploying 41 Florida law enforcement to Texas; and funds used for migrant 42 deportation flights, self-deportation flights, and the 43 Unauthorized Alien Transport Program. 44 (b)âSpending by the Department of Children and Families, 45 the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Agency for Persons with 46 Disabilities, the Department of Elderly Affairs, the Department 47 of Veteransâ Affairs, the Statewide Guardian ad Litem Office, 48 CareerSource Florida, Inc., the Agency for Health Care 49 Administration, and the Division of Emergency Management, 50 related to the âHope Florida: A Path to Prosperityâ initiative 51 launched in 2021, and subsequent Hope Florida program 52 initiatives, including, but not limited to, the Hope Florida 53 Foundation, Inc., the Hope Florida hotline, the Hope Florida 54 website and online âCarePortal,â the Hope Florida Network, and 55 the Hope Florida Fund. The report must also identify the number 56 of full-time equivalent employees in state agencies who are 57 currently working on Hope Florida functions, the extent to which 58 preexisting full-time equivalent employees were repurposed to 59 work for Hope Florida functions, and all contracts for goods or 60 services entered into by state agencies to further the Hope 61 Florida mission. 62 (c)âSpending on contracts for litigation costs and private 63 attorney services. 64 (d)âEfforts related to the Florida Accountability and 65 Fiscal Oversight Office within the Department of Financial 66 Services and the Department of Government Efficiency established 67 in Executive Order 25-44 and whether such efforts are 68 duplicative of the existing Government Efficiency Task Force. 69 (e)âSpending related to Florida Department of 70 Transportation Engineering and Operations Memorandum 25-01. 71 (f)âSpending related to the Canadian Prescription Drug 72 Importation Program established under s. 381.02035, Florida 73 Statutes. 74 (g)âSpending related to the use of ivermectin in treating 75 cancer. 76 (h)âPrograms and tracking tools related to books and 77 educational materials which are duplicative of previous methods. 78 (i)âThe assessment required by s. 1001.03(19)(b), Florida 79 Statutes, including an evaluation of the assessmentâs response 80 rate, accuracy, and whether the information from the assessment 81 could be gathered through other existing research. 82 (j)âNew College of Floridaâs per-student spending as 83 compared to other state colleges and universities. 84 (k)âSpending related to Step Up For Students-Florida, Inc. 85 (l)âThe acquisition of approximately 4 acres in Okaloosa 86 County from Pointe Mezzanine, LLC, and Pointe Resort, LLC, 87 pursuant to s. 174, chapter 2025-198, Laws of Florida. 88 (m)âSpending related to proposed Amendments 3 and 4 to the 89 State Constitution from the 2024 general election, on all of the 90 following: 91 1.âPublic service announcements, advertisements, or other 92 public information messaging pertaining to recreational cannabis 93 use, abortion access, or other subject matter relevant to 94 proposed Amendments 3 and 4. 95 2.âLegal costs incurred defending such public service 96 announcements, advertisements, or other public information 97 messaging. 98 3.âLegal costs incurred related to cease and desist letters 99 sent to television stations and threatened prosecution. 100 (2)âThe report required under subsection (1) must identify: 101 (a)âSpent funds lost to fraud, waste, malfeasance, 102 mismanagement, or misconduct. 103 (b)âUnspent funds at risk of being lost to fraud, waste, 104 malfeasance, mismanagement, or misconduct. 105 (3)âThe report must be submitted to the Governor, the 106 President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of 107 Representatives, and the Attorney General. 108 (4)âThe Attorney General shall pursue legal remedies to 109 recover any funds identified in paragraph (2)(a). Any such 110 recovered funds shall be transferred to the General Revenue Fund 111 to be used to fund the Working Floridians Tax Rebate Program 112 established in s. 409.1466, Florida Statutes. 113 (5)âThe funds identified in paragraph (2)(b) shall be 114 immediately transferred to the General Revenue Fund to be used 115 to fund the Working Floridians Tax Rebate Program established in 116 s. 409.1466, Florida Statutes. 117 Section 2.âSection 409.1466, Florida Statutes, is created 118 to read: 119 409.1466âThe Working Floridians Tax Rebate Program.â 120 (1)âThe Working Floridians Tax Rebate Program is created 121 within the Department of Commerce to provide low- or moderate 122 income residents relief on sales taxes, fuel taxes, property 123 taxes, or other taxes and fees such residents pay in this state 124 during the year, consistent with the goals of the federal Earned 125 Income Tax Credit. The program shall be funded exclusively with 126 moneys identified as being at risk of being lost to waste or 127 recovered after being lost to waste. As used in this subsection, 128 the term âwasteâ includes fraud, malfeasance, mismanagement, and 129 misconduct. 130 (2)âEach person or household that qualifies for and 131 receives the federal Earned Income Tax Credit in a specific year 132 may receive funds from the state if the person or household does 133 all of the following: 134 (a)âMaintains a Florida residence on the federal income tax 135 return during the tax year in which the person or household is 136 applying for the Working Floridians Tax Rebate Program. 137 (b)âApplies to the Department of Commerce, using a form 138 developed by the Department of Commerce, no later than June 30 139 of the year in which the federal Earned Income Tax Credit was 140 received. 141 (c)âProvides the Department of Commerce with documentation 142 verifying the receipt and specific amount of the federal Earned 143 Income Tax Credit. 144 (3)âWithin 30 days after receiving a completed application 145 and verifying the information required under subsection (2), the 146 Department of Commerce shall issue a check or remit funds using 147 direct deposit to the person or household in an amount equal to 148 20 percent of the amount of the federal Earned Income Tax Credit 149 that the person or household received. 150 (4)âThe Department of Commerce shall prepare and submit a 151 report by December 31, 2027, to the Governor, the Cabinet, the 152 President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of 153 Representatives, the Minority Leader of the Senate, and the 154 Minority Leader of the House of Representatives which addresses 155 the feasibility of creating and implementing an automatic 156 Working Floridians Tax Rebate Program using data provided by the 157 Internal Revenue Service or another federal agency so that a 158 person or household may receive the funds from the state without 159 having to complete an annual application and provide 160 documentation under subsection (2). 161 (a)âIf the Department of Commerce determines that an 162 automatic program is not feasible, the report must identify 163 specific barriers to the creation of an automatic program and 164 provide proposed solutions to remove the barriers. 165 (b)âIf the Department of Commerce determines that an 166 automatic program is feasible, the report must include a 167 legislative proposal to implement the automatic program. 168 (5)âReceipt of a rebate under this section may not be used 169 to determine a personâs eligibility for Medicaid, Florida 170 Kidcare, cash assistance, or the Supplemental Nutrition 171 Assistance Program established under 7 U.S.C. ss. 2011 et seq. 172 Section 3.â(1)âThe Department of Commerce is authorized, 173 and all conditions are deemed to be met, to adopt emergency 174 rules pursuant to s. 120.54(4), Florida Statutes, for the 175 purpose of implementing s. 409.1466, Florida Statutes. 176 (2)âNotwithstanding any other law, emergency rules adopted 177 pursuant to subsection (1) are effective for 6 months after 178 adoption and may be renewed during the pendency of procedures to 179 adopt permanent rules addressing the subject of the emergency 180 rules. 181 Section 4.âThis act applies to the federal Earned Income 182 Tax Credit granted beginning on or after January 1, 2027. 183 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.